dev/noun/noun.ne.dix
  <!-- निर्देशक; निर्देशक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्देशक__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कान; कान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कान__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रयास; प्रयास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रयास__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेखक; लेखक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेखक__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रुप; रुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रुप__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बीच; बीच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बीच__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आवश्यक; आवश्यक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आवश्यक__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ता</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्ग; वर्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्ग__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आधार; आधार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आधार__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- परिवार; परिवार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="परिवार__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जाति; जाति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जाति__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शुरू; शुरू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शुरू__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सडक; सडक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सडक__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विकास; विकास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विकास__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उद्देश्य; उद्देश्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उद्देश्य__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिन; दिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ब्याङ्क; ब्याङ्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ब्याङ्क__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुहार; अनुहार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुहार__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साल; साल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साल__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आन्दोलन; आन्दोलन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आन्दोलन__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सहयोग; सहयोग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सहयोग__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुभव; अनुभव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुभव__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छोरी; छोरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छोरी__n_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाटो; बाटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाटो__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रशासन; प्रशासन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रशासन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पक्ष; पक्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पक्ष__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोठा; कोठा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कोठा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रजातन्त्र; प्रजातन्त्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रजातन्त्र__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राज्य; राज्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राज्य__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बालबालिका; बालबालिका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बालबालिका__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रोग; रोग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रोग__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महिना; महिना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महिना__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देश; देश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देश__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रश्न; प्रश्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रश्न__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्षेत्र; क्षेत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्षेत्र__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राजा; राजा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राजा__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नाम; नाम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नाम__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="निर्देशक"><i>निर्देशक</i><par n="निर्देशक__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कान"><i>कान</i><par n="कान__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रयास"><i>प्रयास</i><par n="प्रयास__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="लेखक"><i>लेखक</i><par n="लेखक__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="रुप"><i>रुप</i><par n="रुप__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बीच"><i>बीच</i><par n="बीच__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="आवश्यक"><i>आवश्यक</i><par n="आवश्यक__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्ग"><i>वर्ग</i><par n="वर्ग__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="आधार"><i>आधार</i><par n="आधार__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="परिवार"><i>परिवार</i><par n="परिवार__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="जाति"><i>जाति</i><par n="जाति__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शुरू"><i>शुरू</i><par n="शुरू__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सडक"><i>सडक</i><par n="सडक__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="विकास"><i>विकास</i><par n="विकास__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="उद्देश्य"><i>उद्देश्य</i><par n="उद्देश्य__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="दिन"><i>दिन</i><par n="दिन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्याङ्क"><i>ब्याङ्क</i><par n="ब्याङ्क__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुहार"><i>अनुहार</i><par n="अनुहार__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="साल"><i>साल</i><par n="साल__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="आन्दोलन"><i>आन्दोलन</i><par n="आन्दोलन__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सहयोग"><i>सहयोग</i><par n="सहयोग__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुभव"><i>अनुभव</i><par n="अनुभव__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="छोरी"><i>छोरी</i><par n="छोरी__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बाटो"><i>बाटो</i><par n="बाटो__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रशासन"><i>प्रशासन</i><par n="प्रशासन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्ष"><i>पक्ष</i><par n="पक्ष__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कोठा"><i>कोठा</i><par n="कोठा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रजातन्त्र"><i>प्रजातन्त्र</i><par n="प्रजातन्त्र__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="राज्य"><i>राज्य</i><par n="राज्य__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बालबालिका"><i>बालबालिका</i><par n="बालबालिका__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="रोग"><i>रोग</i><par n="रोग__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="महिना"><i>महिना</i><par n="महिना__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="देश"><i>देश</i><par n="देश__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रश्न"><i>प्रश्न</i><par n="प्रश्न__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="क्षेत्र"><i>क्षेत्र</i><par n="क्षेत्र__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="राजा"><i>राजा</i><par n="राजा__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नाम"><i>नाम</i><par n="नाम__n_nt_aa"/></e>
